New York, session 2025-2026, S7586.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 31 of the private housing finance law is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision 1-a to read as follows: 3 1-a. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter no applica- 4 tion for an increase in the average monthly rental may be filed unless 5 (a) a certificate of the appropriate department or agency having juris- 6 diction thereof is annexed to such application stating either that there 7 are no recorded violations against such property or that all violations 8 therein recorded against such property have been cleared, corrected or 9 abated, or a portion of the increase is specifically set aside in a 10 trust fund to correct all violations; and (b) the company or other 11 applicant certifies it is maintaining all essential services required to 12 be furnished and will continue to maintain such services. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11743-01-5